Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5368.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1p. (1) A licensee may sell a nicotine or tobacco product or nicotine or tobacco accessory at a location that is not the licensee's establishment if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The location is at a fair, festival, or farmers' market. (b) At all times that the licensee offers a nicotine or tobacco product or nicotine or tobacco accessory for sale, the licensee prominently displays to the public in an unobstructed manner the licensee's certificate of licensure issued under section 1e, or a copy of the certificate. (c) At all times that the licensee offers a nicotine or tobacco product or nicotine or tobacco accessory for sale, the licensee prominently displays to the public in an unobstructed manner within 6 feet from each point of sale the sign described in section 1(14) or a sign that is substantially similar to the sign described in section 1(14). (d) The sale is otherwise in compliance with this act. (e) The sale is not otherwise prohibited by law. (2) In addition to any other fine, penalty, or sanction for a violation of this act, a licensee that violates subsection (1)(b) is subject to an administrative fine of $50.00 for each day that the violation occurs. (3) A licensee that violates subsection (1)(c) is subject to an administrative fine of not more than $2,500.00. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01093'25) or House Bill No. 5370 (request no. H01093'25). (b) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01094'25) or House Bill No. 5372 (request no. H01094'25). (c) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01094'25 a) or House Bill No. 5371 (request no. H01094'25 a). (d) Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01722'25) or House Bill No. 5369 (request no. H01722'25).